Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 5. Funeral Service Practitioners Act
§ 33-16-524.
Renewal of license; fees; penalties; continuing education.

Every licensee and permittee under this act shall pay annually a fee for the renewal of his license. All licenses and permits issued by the board shall expire annually on a date set by the board. Persons licensed and permitted under this act shall submit an application on an annual basis for license or permit renewal in the form and manner established by rules and regulations of the board. All application forms shall be accompanied with the annual fee for renewal set by the board. The amount of the renewal fee, payable by a licensee of the board shall be established by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

. The board shall mail on or before the first day of January of each year to each licensee, addressed to his last known address, a notice that his renewal application and renewal fee is due and payable. If the renewal application is not submitted by the expiration date, the license or permit shall be void. Within thirty (30) days after the expiration date a person may apply for renewal of his license or permit in a manner established by rules and regulations of the board. Any person whose license or permit has been voided for failure to renew shall comply with all requirements of a new applicant before a license or permit may be reissued. Upon receipt of the renewal application and full payment of fees, the board shall cause the renewal certificate to be issued. The application for renewal for funeral service practitioners, funeral directors and apprentices shall also be accompanied by satisfactory evidence of participation in continuing education activities as established by rules and regulations of the board.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-525.
Licenses and permits to be signed and displayed; business to be in name of permitted business.

Every license or permit issued under this act shall specify the name of the licensee or permittee, shall be signed by the licensee or authorized designee of the permittee and shall be displayed conspicuously in the place of business or employment of the licensee. No funeral establishment shall be conducted or held forth as being conducted, or advertised as being conducted, under any name except the name of the business appearing on the establishment’s permit issued by the board.

History.

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 70, § 1, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in the first sentence, inserted “or permit, ” “or permittee,” and “or authorized designee of the permittee”; and in the last sentence, substituted “of the business appearing on the establishment's permit” for “appearing as licensee in the license.”

Laws 2015, ch. 70, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-526.
Specific prohibited conduct of licensees.

The board may suspend or revoke licenses or impose other disciplinary action appropriate under the circumstances on licensees, permittees and registrants, after hearing by the board and after ten (10) days’ notice to the licensee, upon the licensee, permittee or registrant being found by the board to have committed any of the following acts or omissions, as the acts are further defined by the board:

Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor related to the licensee’s ability to practice funeral services;

Unprofessional conduct, including, but not limited to:

Misrepresentation or fraud in the conduct of the business or the profession of a funeral director or funeral service practitioner;

False or misleading advertising as a funeral service practitioner;

Solicitation of human dead bodies by the licensee, his agents, assistants or employees, whether the solicitation occurs after death or while death is impending, provided this shall not be deemed to prohibit general advertising;

Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to engage in funeral service practice, unless the unlicensed person is lawfully doing so as an employee of a funeral establishment permitted by the board under the supervision of a funeral service practitioner also employed by the same funeral establishment;

Except as otherwise provided by rule and regulation, using any casket or part of a casket which has previously been used as a receptacle for, or in connection with, the burial or other disposition of a dead human body;

Violation of any of the provisions of this act;

Violation of any state law or municipal or county ordinance or regulation affecting the handling, custody, care or transportation of dead human bodies;

Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining a license;

Refusing to promptly surrender the custody of a dead human body, upon the express order of the person lawfully entitled to the custody thereof.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law the lease of a casket for funeral and other services of a person to be cremated is hereby authorized. The board shall adopt rules regulating the lease of caskets to ensure sanitary use.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-527.
Duty to ascertain cause of death; funeral service practitioner to prepare body for transportation or removal if death due to communicable, contagious or infectious disease.

It shall be the duty of every funeral director and funeral service practitioner, when called to take charge of a dead body, to first ascertain the cause of death from the coroner or medical professional. If death has occurred from any communicable, contagious or infectious disease, the funeral director or funeral service practitioner shall not remove or transport the body until after the body has been prepared for transportation or removal by a licensed funeral service practitioner of this state.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-528.
Persons barred from embalming room; exceptions.

It shall be the duty of every funeral director and funeral service practitioner, not to permit any person or persons to enter any room in any funeral establishment where dead bodies are being embalmed, except licensed funeral service practitioners and their assistants or apprentices, funeral directors and their apprentices, public officers in the discharge of their official duties, and attending physicians and their assistants, unless by direct permission of the immediate family.

History.

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 70, § 1, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “funeral service practitioners and their assistants or apprentices” for “funeral service practitioners and their assistants.”

Laws 2015, ch. 70, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-529.
Exemptions from this act; limitation.

Any duly authorized representative of any church, fraternal order or other association or organization honoring the dead who performs a religious ceremony under the authority of and pursuant to the religious tenets or practices of the organization is hereby exempted from the terms and provisions of this act and from the enforcement of the provisions hereof related to performing of religious ceremonies except for providing the presence of human remains at the religious service.

Any person may:

Counsel individuals, families or next of kin about the final disposition of human remains and about the selection and purchase of funeral goods and services;

Conduct a memorial service or provide a setting for a memorial service and any goods or assistance needed for a memorial service, except providing for the presence of human remains at the memorial service.

Any person licensed pursuant to title 26 of Wyoming statutes may sell insurance or pre-need funeral contracts authorized by that license.

Any person licensed pursuant to title 33 of Wyoming statutes while practicing within the scope of his license is exempt from the provisions of this act.

Any health care institution licensed pursuant to title 35 of Wyoming statutes when operating within the scope of its license is exempt from the provisions of this act.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-530.
Crematory operator; chemical disposer; permit required; qualifications.

It is unlawful for any person or entity to operate a crematory disposing of human remains without the crematory being first granted a permit by the board as a crematory, or to chemically dispose of human remains in a chemical disposition facility, unless the chemical disposition facility is first granted a permit by the board to operate as a chemical disposition facility.

The board shall examine the premises and structure of any crematory or chemical disposition facility and shall issue the permit only if the applicant and the structure meet the standards required by rules and regulations of the board and the provisions of this act.

Every person desiring to operate a crematory or chemically dispose of human remains within the state of Wyoming shall apply to the board for a crematory permit or a chemical disposition facility permit, upon a form and in the manner prescribed by the board, accompanied by the appropriate fee and satisfactory evidence of the following:

The applicant, unless an organization, shall be a licensed funeral service practitioner or funeral director who is a shareholder or officer in or is directly employed by a licensed funeral establishment. The applicant, when an organization, shall be a funeral establishment permitted by the board that employs at least one (1) licensed funeral service practitioner assigned as the funeral service licensee responsible for the crematory or chemical disposition facility;

The application shall designate a licensed funeral service practitioner as the funeral service practitioner responsible for the crematory or chemical disposition facility; and

The crematory or chemical disposition facility shall meet the standards required by the rules and regulations of the board and the provisions of this act, and receive a satisfactory inspection by the board;

An employee who is not a licensed funeral service practitioner may assist in the operation of a crematory or chemical disposition facility to the extent directed by a funeral service practitioner following the facility’s receipt of human remains in a closed cremation container. An employee who is not a funeral service practitioner shall not handle human remains or open a closed cremation container. The employee may conduct the full crematory or chemical disposition process under the direction of a funeral service practitioner or funeral director. The funeral service practitioner overseeing the facility shall successfully complete a crematory or chemical disposition facility operator’s certification program approved by the board. The supervising funeral service practitioner shall ensure that employees who are operating crematories under the direction of a funeral service practitioner or funeral director successfully complete a crematory or chemical disposition operator’s certification program approved by the board. The board may waive or extend the time to complete the certification program required by this section due to hardship or difficulty in completing the required certification program.

If the applicant proposes to operate more than one (1) crematory or chemical disposition facility, the applicant shall make a separate application and procure a separate license for each separate location.

Any crematory or chemical disposer licensee desiring to change the location of the business shall make application to the board at least thirty (30) days prior to the time that the change in location is to take effect. A fee as established by the board shall accompany the application for the change. The board shall grant the change provided the location conforms to the provisions of this act.

Any crematory or chemical disposition facility desiring to change the name of the business shall make application to the board at least thirty (30) days prior to the time that the change in name is to take effect. A fee as established by the board shall accompany the application for the change.

Any crematory or chemical disposition facility desiring to change the licensed funeral service practitioner responsible for the crematory or chemical disposition facility shall make application to the board immediately. A fee as established by the board shall accompany the application for the change.

History.

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 70, § 1, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in (c)(i), inserted “or funeral director”; and added (c)(iv).

Laws 2015, ch. 70, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-531.
Records of crematories and chemical disposition facilities; crematory and chemical disposition authorization.

Upon the receipt of a human body for cremation or chemical disposition, the crematory or chemical disposition facility shall deliver to the funeral director, funeral service practitioner or his agent who delivers the body to the crematory or chemical disposition facility, a receipt therefor, showing the date of delivery, name of the funeral director or funeral service practitioner from whom the body is received and the name of the deceased. Each crematory or chemical disposition facility shall maintain a record of each cremation or chemical disposition of human remains, submitted to it by the person authorizing cremation or chemical disposition disclosing, at a minimum:

The name of the person cremated or chemically disposed;

The name of the person authorizing the cremation or chemical disposition;

A statement that the person authorizing cremation or chemical disposition has the right of disposition with regard to the person being cremated or chemically disposed;

The date the body was received;

The date the cremation or chemical disposition was performed;

Whether the person being cremated or chemically disposed has been implanted with medical devices; and

Any other information as the board may require.

The record of each cremation or chemical disposition shall be signed by the owner or operator of the crematorium or chemical disposition facility and by the funeral service practitioner or other authorized person having charge of the preparation of the human remains for cremation or chemical disposition. The record shall be kept at the crematory or chemical disposition facility for inspection by the board which may also require copies thereof to be filed with it containing such information as may be necessary for the use of the board.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-532.
Cremation chambers and crematories for disposition of human remains.

Cremation chambers of crematoriums and facilities of chemical disposition permitted by this act shall be used exclusively for the cremation or chemical disposition of human remains.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the effective date July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-533.
Cremation of human remains; chemical disposition.

The funeral director, funeral service practitioner, or other person having charge of the preparation of human remains for burial or the last rites and committal services thereof shall have the right to be present either in person or by his employees, at any stage of the cremation or chemical disposition of such human remains. No crematorium or other appropriately licensed entity conducting chemical disposition shall accept human remains for cremation or chemical disposition until it has received a burial-transit permit required by law.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-534.
Inspection of crematories and facilities for chemical disposition; rules and regulations.

The board shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations governing the cremation and chemical disposition of human remains. The rules shall provide minimum standards of sanitation, required equipment and fire and environmental protection which the board deems necessary for the protection of the public. The board shall inspect all crematoriums and other appropriately permitted entities conducting chemical disposition at least once each year.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-535.
Removal of human remains from casket or other container; use of container.

Human remains delivered to a crematorium or other appropriately permitted entity conducting chemical disposition shall not be removed from the casket or other container without the written authorization of the person giving the consent to or requesting the cremation or chemical disposition of the human remains. Notwithstanding any other provision of law the lease of a casket for funerals and other services of a person to be cremated is authorized.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-536.
Violation declared public nuisance; enforcement; criminal penalties.

Maintenance or operation of a building or structure within the state of Wyoming as a crematorium or chemical disposition facility in violation of the provisions of this act or the rules and regulations of the board is a public nuisance and may be abated as provided by law. A person violating this section or rules and regulations promulgated by the board related to crematories, cremation or chemical disposition is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both. A second or subsequent conviction for violation of this act during a thirty-six (36) month period shall constitute a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-537.
Cremation containers.

A cremation container shall meet substantially all of the following standards:

Be composed of readily combustible materials suitable for cremation;

Be able to be closed in order to provide a complete covering for the human remains;

Be resistant to leakage and spillage;

Be rigid enough for handling with ease; and

Provide protection for the health, safety, and integrity of crematory personnel and the cremation facility.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.